Missouri, session 2026, SB1470.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 2.040, 2.050, 2.060, 3.010, 3.110,
3.125, 3.140, 3.142, 23.010, 23.020, 23.040, 23.050, 23.060,
23.070, 23.080, 23.090, 23.140, 23.150, 23.160, 23.170, 23.195,
and 23.262, RSMo, are repealed and nineteen new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 2.040, 2.050, 2.060,
3.010, 3.110, 3.125, 3.140, 3.142, 23.010, 23.020, 23.040,
23.050, 23.060, 23.070, 23.080, 23.090, 23.140, 23.150, and
23.195, to read as follows:
2.040. The joint committee on legislative research
shall provide copies of, or make available in a web-based
electronic format, or both, all laws, measures and
resolutions duly enacted by the general assembly and all
amendments to the constitution and all measures approved by
the people since the last publication of the session laws
pursuant to section 2.030, giving the date of the approval
or adoption thereof. The joint committee on legislative
research shall headnote, collate, index the laws,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

HCS SB 1470 2
resolutions and constitutional amendments, and compare the
proof sheets of the printed copies with the original rolls.
The revisor of statutes shall insert therein an attestation
under the revisor's hand that the revisor has compared the
laws, resolutions, constitutional amendments and measures
therein contained with the original rolls and copies in the
office of the secretary of state and that the same are true
copies of such laws, measures, resolutions and
constitutional amendments as the same appear in the original
rolls in the office of the secretary of state. The joint
committee on legislative research shall cause the completed
laws, resolutions and constitutional amendments to be
printed and bound, or produced in a web-based electronic
format, or both.
2.050. The complete printed copies of laws,
resolutions, constitutional amendments and measures when
printed and bound shall be delivered to the revisor of
statutes who shall distribute [one copy without cost to each
member of the general assembly and one copy each, without
cost, to every county circuit clerk, circuit judge,
associate circuit judge, prosecuting attorney, and sheriff.
One copy each, without cost, shall be delivered to other
officers, institutions and agencies who are entitled to
copies of the Revised Statutes of Missouri under section
3.130, if requested] such copies in accordance with section
3.130.
2.060. The revisor of statutes may sell copies of the
laws and resolutions[, not required by this chapter to be
distributed without charge,] at actual cost of printing and
binding, as determined by the joint committee on legislative
research, plus the cost of delivery, and the money received
therefor shall be [paid to the director of revenue and]

HCS SB 1470 3
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the
statutory revision fund.
3.010. [Only upon the adoption of a concurrent
resolution by the general assembly] In accordance with
Article III, Section 34 of the Constitution of Missouri, the
revised statutes of Missouri shall be printed, published and
distributed in as many volumes as the committee on
legislative research (herein called "the committee") shall
determine, and such publication shall be under the direction
and supervision of the committee. If an appropriation is to
be provided for a general republication of the revised
statutes, the general assembly shall adopt a concurrent
resolution for such general republication. The [annotations
or] supplements to the revised statutes of Missouri may be
printed separately and without a concurrent resolution being
adopted by the general assembly. The cost of printing,
binding and delivery of such [publication] publications
shall be paid from funds appropriated from the general
revenue for that purpose or, if no appropriation is provided
for that purpose, from the statutory revision fund under
section 3.142.
3.110. The printing and publication of the revised
statutes of Missouri, annotations thereto and supplements or
pocket parts and the paper used therefor, [shall] may be
obtained through the state director of the division of
purchasing, as otherwise provided by law.
3.125. 1. The committee may publish annual or
biennial cumulative or noncumulative supplements or pocket
parts to the revised statutes of Missouri in lieu of
complete editions thereof except at such times as complete
editions are published. Any supplement or edition of pocket
parts is subject in all respects to the provisions of this

HCS SB 1470 4
law relating to the publication of an edition of the revised
statutes and the committee has the same powers and duties
with respect to the publication thereof. When funds for the
printing thereof are duly appropriated by the general
assembly or moneys in the statutory revision fund under
section 3.142 are available, the committee shall cause to be
classified, arranged, numbered and printed in either an
edition of the revised statutes or in supplements or pocket
parts thereto, in accordance with this chapter, all laws of
a general nature adopted at any session of the general
assembly.
2. The committee shall report to the general assembly
whenever called upon, and shall prepare and submit to the
general assembly such consolidation, revision and other
matters relating to the statutes as can be completed from
time to time.
3.140. The committee on legislative research may,
through the revisor of statutes, sell copies of the revised
statutes of Missouri, and any supplement or edition of
pocket parts thereto, in print and/or in a web-based
electronic format at a price to be determined by the
committee, taking into account the cost of printing and
binding, producing the statutes and maintaining the website,
including the cost of delivery, and the money received
therefor shall be paid to the director of revenue and
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the
[general revenue fund] statutory revision fund as required
under section 3.142.
3.142. 1. There is hereby established in the state
treasury a revolving fund known as the "Statutory Revision
Fund", and which shall receive funds paid to the revisor of
statutes for sales of the revised statutes of Missouri or

HCS SB 1470 5
any supplement thereto, whether in printed, electronic,
magnetic, or other form and funds received for any other
service for which there is a fee charged by the committee on
legislative research. The committee on legislative research
shall determine the form and any fees or charges for the
statutes or services. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund and shall make disbursements from the
fund for the costs associated with general republication of
the revised statutes of Missouri and its annual supplements
if no specific appropriation is provided by the general
assembly, and enhancing or producing the electronic form of
the revised statutes in a computer readable form, enhancing
the electronic processing of computerized legislative
drafting and such other purposes authorized by the joint
committee on legislative research upon appropriation by the
general assembly. Moneys in the fund may also be used at
the direction of the committee on legislative research to
provide the revised statutes of Missouri and any supplement
thereto to public libraries of this state in a computer
readable format for use by patrons of the libraries.
2. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of
any biennium not to exceed twice the cost of providing the
annual supplement to the revised statutes of Missouri is
exempt from the provisions of section 33.080 relating to
transfer of unexpended balances to the ordinary revenue fund.
23.010. A permanent joint committee of the general
assembly known as the "Committee on Legislative Research",
to be comprised of the chairman of the senate appropriations
committee [and nine other members of the senate and], the
president pro tempore of the senate, two members from the
majority party of the senate, the senate minority floor
leader, and one member from the minority party of the

HCS SB 1470 6
senate, the chairman of the house budget committee [and nine
other members of the house of representatives], the speaker
of the house of representatives, two members of the majority
party of the house of representatives, the minority floor
leader of the house of representatives, and one member from
the minority party of the house of representatives, is
established and its offices are in the capitol building,
Jefferson City, Missouri. The senate majority members of
the committee shall be appointed by the president pro [tem]
tempore of the senate [and], the senate minority member
shall be appointed by the senate minority floor leader, the
house majority members shall be appointed by the speaker of
the house [and], and the house minority members shall be
appointed by the house minority floor leader. Appointment
of each member shall continue during his term of office as a
member of the general assembly, or until a successor is
appointed to fill the place of any committee member whose
term of office has expired. [No major party shall be
represented by more than six members from the house nor more
than six from the senate on the committee. The general
assembly, by a majority vote of the elected members, may
discharge any or all of the members of the committee at any
time and select their successors.]
23.020. The committee shall perform the following
services for the members of the general assembly:
(1) Provide a research and reference service on
legislative problems;
(2) Upon written request, make investigation into
legislative and governmental institutions of this state or
other states to aid the general assembly;

HCS SB 1470 7
(3) Upon written request, assist and cooperate with
any interim legislative committee or commission created by
the general assembly;
(4) Upon [written] request of the joint committee,
draft or aid in drafting revision bills under section
23.045, and any resolutions[, memorials] and amendments
directly related to any revision bill or the duties and
functions of the joint committee on legislative research,
and render any other service in connection therewith for any
member of the general assembly.
23.040. From the time the general assembly of the
state convenes until it is adjourned finally, the committee
on legislative research, through its representatives, shall
give consideration to and service concerning any bill before
the general assembly requested by any member of the senate
or the house of representatives or any committee of the
general assembly having the bills before it for
consideration. This service shall continue after
adjournment and during any recess or vacation. [Employees
of the committee shall not oppose or urge legislation but,
upon request, shall assist members of the general assembly
as to bills, resolutions and measures, draft them in proper
form and furnish to members any available information upon
matters which fall within the scope of the duties of the
committee.]
23.050. 1. The committee [may] shall obtain
information upon the needs, organization, functioning,
efficiency and financial status of any department of state
government or of any institution or agency which is
supported in whole or in part by revenue of the state;
collect and assemble information concerning the revenue of
the state and the tax resources of the state and upon

HCS SB 1470 8
questions of statewide interest which may reasonably become
subjects of legislative action or of legislative
consideration; make available such information as is
requested by any member or member-elect of the general
assembly, provided that personally identifiable information
may be excluded in accordance with applicable law.
2. The committee shall compile a report of its
activities and a detailed account of its expenditures for
submission to the general assembly, which report shall be
completed at least thirty days prior to the convening of
each regular session of the general assembly. The report
shall be [mailed to the post-office address of] delivered to
each member of the present and forthcoming general assembly
and a copy of the report shall be submitted to each state
elective officer. The report shall include any
recommendations for legislative action as well as any
recommendations which the committee desires to make
concerning the efficient and economical operation of the
state government.
23.060. The material, including books and other
publications of the research library maintained by the
committee, is available to the members of the general
assembly. All officers of the state, all departments,
commissions and bureaus of the state, and all persons
connected therewith, the University of Missouri, the
[teachers'] public colleges and universities, and all
agencies of the state which are supported in whole or in
part by state funds shall give the committee, or its duly
authorized representatives, complete access to their records
and full information and all reasonable assistance in any
matter of research or investigation which, in the judgment
of the committee, requires recourse to them or to data

HCS SB 1470 9
within their knowledge or control; but this section does not
compel the disclosure of any records or information which is
declared to be privileged or confidential by any other law
of this state, unless the committee is specifically
authorized to procure the information by a concurrent
resolution adopted by the general assembly.
23.070. The committee on legislative research shall
meet within [ten] thirty days after the convening of each
general assembly and organize by selecting a [chairman and a
vice chairman] chairperson and vice chairperson, one of whom
shall be a member of the senate and one of whom shall be a
member of the house of representatives. [Until January of
1985, the chairman shall be a member of the house. In 1985
the chairman shall be a member of the senate. In 1987 the
chairman shall be a member of the house. The chairmanship]
The chairpersonship and vice chairpersonship shall alternate
between members of the senate and house [each] every two
years [after 1987]. The director shall serve as secretary
to the committee on legislative research. Unless otherwise
directed by the committee, [he] the director shall keep the
records of the committee and be subject to the jurisdiction
and order of the committee during the vacation or recess of
the general assembly. The regular meeting place of the
committee shall be in Jefferson City, Missouri, and after
its inception and organization it shall regularly meet at
least [once every three months] twice a year. A majority of
the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum and a
majority of a quorum may act for the entire committee.
Special meetings of the committee may be called at such time
and place within the state as the [chairman] chairperson
thereof designates.

HCS SB 1470 10
23.080. 1. The committee may regularly employ and fix
the compensation of a director of research who is competent
to assume administration of the necessary activities of the
committee under the direction of the committee. The
committee may also employ other attorneys, research
assistants, clerks and other persons as it deems necessary
within the limits of the appropriation made therefor to
carry out the provisions of this chapter or to provide
assistance for the members and committees of the general
assembly. Except for those employees assigned to the
oversight division, all employees of the committee shall be
under the supervision of the director of research, and he or
she shall, as directed by the committee, assign and
supervise all work projects of those employees and keep all
necessary personnel records for those employees and others
of the committee if so directed. All employees of the
oversight division shall be under the supervision of the
director of the oversight division[, and he shall, as
directed by the subcommittee, assign and supervise all work
projects of the employees of that division].
2. The committee may provide necessary legal reports
and other publications to be kept in the library of the
committee and pay for same out of any appropriations made to
the committee. The secretary of state and the revisor of
statutes shall furnish the librarian, without charge, the
number of Missouri statutes and session laws as is desired
by the committee to enable it to exchange the statutes and
session laws for those of other states.
23.090. The committee on legislative research has
charge and control of the legislative library and all other
space within the capitol assigned to it, including the
oversight division.

HCS SB 1470 11
23.140. 1. Legislation, with the exception of
appropriation bills, introduced into either house of the
general assembly shall, before being acted upon, be
submitted to the oversight division of the committee on
legislative research for the preparation of a fiscal note.
The staff of the oversight division shall prepare a fiscal
note, examining the items contained in subsection 2 and such
additional items as may be provided either by joint rule of
the house and senate or by resolution adopted by the
committee or the oversight subcommittee.
2. The fiscal note shall state:
(1) The cost of the proposed legislation to the state
for the next two fiscal years;
(2) Whether or not the proposed legislation will
establish a program or agency that will duplicate an
existing program or agency;
(3) Whether or not there is a federal mandate for the
program or agency;
(4) Whether or not the proposed program or agency will
have significant direct fiscal impact upon any political
subdivision of the state;
(5) Whether or not any new physical facilities will be
required; and
(6) Whether or not the proposed legislation will have
an economic impact on small businesses. For the purpose of
this subdivision "small business" means a corporation,
partnership, sole proprietorship or other business entity,
including its affiliates, that:
(a) Is independently owned and operated; and
(b) Employs fifty or fewer full-time employees.
3. The fiscal note for a bill shall accompany the bill
throughout its course of passage. No member of the general

HCS SB 1470 12
assembly, lobbyist or persons other than oversight division
staff members shall participate in the preparation of any
fiscal note unless the communication is in writing, with a
duplicate to be filed with the fiscal note or unless
requested for information by the fiscal analyst preparing
the note. Violations of this provision shall be reported to
the chairman of the legislative research committee and
subject the fiscal note and proposed bill to subcommittee
review. Once a fiscal note has been signed and approved by
the director of the oversight division, the note shall not
be changed or revised without prior approval of the chairman
of the legislative research committee, except to reflect
changes made in the bill it accompanies, or to correct
patent typographical, clerical or drafting errors that do
not involve changes of substance, nor shall substitution be
made therefor. Appeals to revise, change or to substitute a
fiscal note shall be made in writing by a member of the
general assembly to the chairman of the legislative research
committee and a hearing before the committee or subcommittee
shall be granted as soon as possible. Any member of the
general assembly, upon presentation of new or additional
material, may, within three legislative days after the
hearing on the request to revise, change or substitute a
fiscal note, request one rehearing before the full committee
to further consider the requested change. The subcommittee,
if satisfied that new or additional material has been
presented, may recommend such rehearing to the full
committee, and the rehearing shall be held as soon as
possible thereafter.
4. The director of the division, hereinafter provided
for, or the director's designees, shall seek information and
advice from the affected department, division or agency of

HCS SB 1470 13
state government and shall call upon the research staffs of
the house of representatives and of the senate, and upon the
staffs of the house and senate appropriations committees for
assistance in carrying out fiscal notes and evaluations of
programs selected by the committee, during the interim, and
each staff shall supply such information or advice as it
deems appropriate in response to the inquiry. The state
auditor shall, upon request, cooperate and provide
assistance in the conduct of audits and the preparation of
reports made in connection therewith. The state auditor
may, upon the request of the director or his or her
designee, cooperate and provide assistance in the
preparation of fiscal notes.
5. The staff of the oversight division shall prepare a
post-implementation fiscal note for any legislation that has
been enacted and fully implemented for two years. All
requirements and obligations with respect to the preparation
of fiscal notes elsewhere in law shall apply to post-
implementation fiscal notes. The express purpose of a post-
implementation fiscal note shall be to compare the estimate
of the fiscal note relating to the final enacted version of
the legislation to the actual experience after the
legislation was implemented. To the extent reporting must
be implemented at the time of enactment of the legislation
by any department, division, or agency of state government
in order to comply with the requirements of the eventual
post-implementation fiscal note, such reporting shall occur
at the time of enactment.
23.150. 1. The committee on legislative research
shall organize an oversight division to prepare fiscal notes
and to conduct program evaluations [of state agencies],
including program evaluations involving budget transparency

HCS SB 1470 14
and accountability. [The committee may form a subcommittee
of not less than six members to provide direct supervision
of the personnel and practices of the division. The
subcommittee shall consist of one-half of the members
appointed by the chair from the house which he or she
represents and one-half of the members appointed by the vice
chair from the house which he or she represents.]
2. Within the limits of the appropriations made for
this division, the committee [shall] may regularly employ
[a] and fix the compensation of the director of the
oversight division and other personnel as it deems
necessary. The director shall be qualified by training and
experience to conduct such evaluations, and he or she shall
be directly responsible for those activities. The director
of the oversight division, with the consent of the joint
committee, may employ personnel necessary to carry out the
duties prescribed in this chapter. Persons employed to work
in the oversight division shall be professional persons
possessing a wide knowledge and demonstrated expertise in
governmental programming and financial planning, in
conducting program review evaluations and analytic studies,
and of federal, state, and local government budgetary
processes, laws and regulations of the state of Missouri.
23.195. 1. The oversight division of the committee on
legislative research shall maintain a register of all state
bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of all state
agencies and of entities of the state given authority by law
to incur indebtedness, whether or not the indebtedness is a
liability of the state, including lease purchase agreements
of at least ten thousand dollars for personal property which
have been issued or entered into by the state of Missouri or
by any state agency, authority or institution. Indebtedness

HCS SB 1470 15
compiled in the register shall include but not be limited to
that incurred by the third state building fund, the higher
education loan authority, the agriculture and small business
revenue authority, the health and education facilities
authority, the Missouri economic development commission, the
[environment] environmental and energy resources improvement
authority, the state-supported educational institutions of
higher learning, the bi-state development authority, the
several interstate bridge authorities, and any metro
transportation districts. The register shall contain all
the details concerning the issuance and retirement of such
bonds or other evidence of indebtedness, including, but not
limited to, the date of issuance and maturity, the name of
the issuing state agency, terms and costs of any lease
purchase agreement if applicable, the rate of interest, the
manner of redemption, the purpose for which issued, and, if
retired, the date and manner of retirement.
2. The oversight division shall report on the total
bonded and other indebtedness including lease purchase
agreements of this state and its various agencies, entities,
and institutions to the individual members of the general
assembly on or before January fifteenth of each year.
Copies of the report shall also be delivered to the
governor, state auditor, state treasurer, and the state
librarian. Copies shall be made available to other
interested parties. Such report shall contain sufficient
data and information to enable the members of the general
assembly to determine the amount of indebtedness outstanding
for each purpose for which bonded and other indebtedness has
been incurred and the total amount of money which will be
necessary to fully repay all principal and interest due on
such bonded or other indebtedness or to fulfill the terms of

HCS SB 1470 16
any lease purchase agreement; including, but not limited to,
a summary of all pertinent information contained in the
register required by subsection 1 of this section.
3. Inclusion of any indebtedness in this register
shall not be construed that the indebtedness is, or is not,
state indebtedness.
4. The state auditor and each state agency and entity
shall cooperate fully with the oversight division in
collecting information for this register, and shall provide
information as requested for inclusion therein.
[23.160. 1. As used in this chapter, the
term "program evaluation" means a study which
determines and evaluates program performance
according to program objectives,
responsibilities, and duties as set forth by
statute or regulation. Program evaluations, in
accordance with generally accepted program
evaluation standards, shall determine:
(1) Whether the program is being performed
and administered as authorized or required by
law, and whether this action conforms with
statutory intent;
(2) Whether the objectives and intended
benefits are being achieved, and whether the
absence of such achievements suggest the need
for correction or additional legislation;
(3) Benefits derived from any program in
relation to the expenditures made therefor; and
(4) Whether the program duplicates,
overlaps, or conflicts with any other state
program.
2. As used in this chapter, the term
"resources" includes appropriated funds, federal
funds, grants, and personnel, and also includes
equipment and space, whether assigned, owned or
leased.
3. As used in this chapter, the term
"agency" includes each department and office
within the executive branch of government and
each identifiable unit thereof, including

HCS SB 1470 17
institutions of higher learning, and each
identifiable unit of the legislative and
judicial branches of government.]
[23.170. 1. The oversight division of the
committee on legislative research shall,
pursuant to a duly adopted concurrent resolution
of the general assembly, or pursuant to a
resolution adopted by the committee on
legislative research, conduct program
evaluations of agencies as directed by any such
resolution.
2. The staff of any agency subject to a
program evaluation shall fully cooperate with
the staff of the oversight division and shall
provide all necessary information and assistance
for such an evaluation. All records of an
agency, unless otherwise expressly declared by
law to be confidential, may be inspected by the
oversight division staff while conducting the
evaluation, and the agency subject to the
evaluation shall afford the oversight division
staff with ample opportunity to observe agency
operations.
3. All evaluations shall be completed
within one year unless an extension is
authorized by the committee, but progress
reports shall be made to the committee at least
quarterly.
4. Any member of the general assembly and
any committee of either house of the general
assembly may submit requests for program
evaluations to the committee on legislative
research, and any agency may request an
evaluation of its operations. The director of
the division shall present program evaluations
completed during the previous legislative
interim period to appropriate committees of each
chamber during early hearings of those
committees at the next regular session.]
[23.262. 1. Between September first and
December first of the calendar year prior to the
year in which a program subject to sections
23.250 to 23.298 is scheduled to sunset, the

HCS SB 1470 18
committee shall conduct public hearings
concerning but not limited to the application to
the program of the criteria provided in section
23.268.
2. The committee may hold the public
hearings prior to September first if the
evaluation of the program required in
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
23.259 is complete and available to the public.]
✓